src/morphology/stems/fao-acronyms.lexc
! ========= !
! Akronymer !
! ========= !

LEXICON Acronym-fao
Akronymnumeralier ; ! Nogle tal först, måskje=?

StÍF ACRO ;
T5PC ACRO ;





LEXICON Akronymnumeralier
%0 anl ; 1 anl ; 2 anl ; 3 anl ; 4 anl ; 5 anl ; 6 anl ; 7 anl ; 8 anl ; 9 anl ; 

LEXICON anl ! akronymloop
     Akronymnumeralier ; ! loop
     FIRSTLETTER ;       ! Over til bogstaverne
 :%- FIRSTLETTER ;       ! ... med stræg først


LEXICON ACRO               
%-      ARABIC ;           ! Here we dive over to the numerals, 
        ARABIC ;           ! Here we dive over to the numerals
+N+ACR: acroconnector ;    ! Here we add the POS tag and go ACRO
        R- ;

LEXICON acroconnector  
:%- acrocase ;             
:%' acrocase ;             
:   acrocase ;

LEXICON acrocase
+Nom: # ;
+Acc: # ;
+Dat: # ;
+Gen:%>s # ;
